Florida, session 2026, SB7036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 175 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 176 120.81, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 177 120.81âExceptions and special requirements; general areas.â 178 (1)âEDUCATIONAL UNITS.â 179 (a)âDistrict school boards are not subject to the 180 requirements for rules in this chapter when making and adopting 181 rules with public input at a public meeting. Notwithstanding s. 182 120.536(1) and the flush left provisions of s. 120.52(8), 183 district school boards may adopt rules to implement their 184 general powers under s. 1001.41. 185 Section 2.âSubsection (21) of section 1001.42, Florida 186 Statutes, is amended to read: 187 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 188 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 189 powers and perform all duties listed below: 190 (21)âEDUCATIONAL EMERGENCY.âTo free schools that have with 191 a school grade of âDâ or âFâ or are persistently low-performing 192 schools as described in s. 1002.333 from contract restrictions 193 that limit the school districtâs schoolâs ability to implement 194 programs and strategies needed to improve student performance, a 195 district school board may adopt salary incentives or other 196 strategies that address the selection, placement, compensation, 197 and expectations of instructional personnel and provide 198 principals with the autonomy described in s. 1012.28(8). For 199 purposes of this subsection, an educational emergency exists in 200 a school district if one or more schools in the district have a 201 school grade of âDâ or âF.â or are persistently low-performing 202 schools as described in s. 1002.333. Notwithstanding chapter 203 447, relating to collective bargaining, a district school board 204 may: 205 (a)âProvide salary incentives that differentiate based on a 206 teacherâs certification, subject area taught, or grade level 207 taught. Such incentives are not subject to collective bargaining 208 requirements. 209 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 1012.2315, relating to assignment of 210 teachers, adopt strategies to assign high-quality teachers more 211 equitably across schools in the district to low-performing 212 schools as a management right. Such strategies are not subject 213 to collective bargaining requirements. 214 Section 3.âParagraph (i) of subsection (3) of section 215 1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 216 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 217 school students must receive accurate and timely information 218 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 219 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 220 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 221 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 222 (3)âHEALTH ISSUES.â 223 (i)âEpinephrine use and supply.â 224 1.âA student who has experienced or is at risk for life 225 threatening allergic reactions may carry a United States Food 226 and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved an epinephrine delivery 227 device auto-injector and self-administer epinephrine by such 228 FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector while in school, 229 participating in school-sponsored activities, or in transit to 230 or from school or school-sponsored activities if the school has 231 been provided with parental and physician authorization. The 232 State Board of Education, in cooperation with the Department of 233 Health, shall adopt rules for such use of FDA-approved 234 epinephrine delivery devices which must auto-injectors that 235 shall include provisions to protect the safety of all students 236 from the misuse or abuse of such delivery devices auto 237 injectors. A school district, county health department, public 238 private partner, and their employees and volunteers shall be 239 indemnified by the parent of a student authorized to carry an 240 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector for any 241 and all liability with respect to the studentâs use of an FDA 242 approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector pursuant to 243 this paragraph. 244 2.âA public school may purchase a supply of FDA-approved 245 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale 246 distributor as defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an 247 arrangement with a wholesale distributor or manufacturer as 248 defined in s. 499.003 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery 249 devices auto-injectors at fair-market, free, or reduced prices 250 for use in the event a student has an anaphylactic reaction. The 251 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be 252 maintained in a secure location on the public schoolâs premises. 253 The participating school district shall adopt a protocol 254 developed by a licensed physician for the administration by 255 school personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic 256 reaction and to administer an epinephrine by an FDA-approved 257 delivery device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved 258 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to 259 and used by a student authorized to self-administer epinephrine 260 by FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector under subparagraph 261 1. or trained school personnel. 262 3.âThe school district and its employees, agents, and the 263 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA 264 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not 265 liable for any injury arising from the use of such an 266 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by 267 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and 268 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an 269 anaphylactic reaction: 270 a.âUnless the trained school personnelâs action is willful 271 and wanton; 272 b.âNotwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the 273 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been 274 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging 275 that the school district is not liable; and 276 c.âRegardless of whether authorization has been given by 277 the studentâs parents or guardians or by the studentâs 278 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 279 nurse. 280 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (7) and paragraph 281 (e) of subsection (10) of section 1002.33, Florida Statutes, are 282 amended to read: 283 1002.33âCharter schools.â 284 (7)âCHARTER.âThe terms and conditions for the operation of 285 a charter school, including a virtual charter school, shall be 286 set forth by the sponsor and the applicant in a written 287 contractual agreement, called a charter. The sponsor and the 288 governing board of the charter school or virtual charter school 289 shall use the standard charter contract or standard virtual 290 charter contract, respectively, pursuant to subsection (21), 291 which shall incorporate the approved application and any addenda 292 approved with the application. Any term or condition of a 293 proposed charter contract or proposed virtual charter contract 294 that differs from the standard charter or virtual charter 295 contract adopted by rule of the State Board of Education shall 296 be presumed a limitation on charter school flexibility. The 297 sponsor may not impose unreasonable rules or regulations that 298 violate the intent of giving charter schools greater flexibility 299 to meet educational goals. The charter shall be signed by the 300 governing board of the charter school and the sponsor, following 301 a public hearing to ensure community input. 302 (c)1.âA charter may be renewed provided that a program 303 review demonstrates that the criteria in paragraph (a) have been 304 successfully accomplished and that none of the grounds for 305 nonrenewal established by paragraph (8)(a) have been expressly 306 found. The charter of a charter school that meets these 307 requirements and has received a school grade lower than a âBâ 308 pursuant to s. 1008.34 in the most recently graded school year 309 must be renewed for no less than a 5-year term except as 310 provided in paragraph (9)(n). In order to facilitate long-term 311 financing for charter school construction, charter schools 312 operating for a minimum of 3 years and demonstrating exemplary 313 academic programming, which may include academic performance 314 measured by school improvement ratings, and fiscal management 315 are eligible for a 15-year charter renewal. Such long-term 316 charter is subject to annual review and may be terminated during 317 the term of the charter. 318 2.âThe 15-year charter renewal that may be granted pursuant 319 to subparagraph 1. must be granted to a charter school that has 320 received a school grade of âAâ or âBâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 in 321 the most recently graded school year and that is not in a state 322 of financial emergency or deficit position as defined by this 323 section. Such long-term charter is subject to annual review and 324 may be terminated during the term of the charter pursuant to 325 subsection (8). 326 (10)âELIGIBLE STUDENTS.â 327 (e)âA charter school may limit the enrollment process only 328 to target the following student populations: 329 1.âStudents within specific age groups or grade levels. 330 2.âStudents considered at risk of dropping out of school or 331 academic failure. Such students shall include exceptional 332 education students. 333 3.âStudents enrolling in a charter school-in-the-workplace 334 or charter school-in-a-municipality established pursuant to 335 subsection (15). 336 4.âStudents residing within a reasonable distance of the 337 charter school, as described in paragraph (20)(c). Such students 338 shall be subject to a random lottery and to the racial/ethnic 339 balance provisions described in subparagraph (7)(a)8. or any 340 federal provisions that require a school to achieve a 341 racial/ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves or 342 within the racial/ethnic range of other nearby public schools. 343 5.âStudents who meet reasonable academic, artistic, or 344 other eligibility standards established by the charter school 345 and included in the charter school application and charter or, 346 in the case of existing charter schools, standards that are 347 consistent with the schoolâs mission and purpose. Such standards 348 shall be in accordance with current state law and practice in 349 public schools and may not discriminate against otherwise 350 qualified individuals. A school that limits enrollment for such 351 purposes must place a student on a progress monitoring plan for 352 at least one semester before dismissing such student from the 353 school. A student may not be dismissed based on academic 354 performance while a school is implementing a school improvement 355 plan pursuant to paragraph (9)(n) or corrective action plan 356 pursuant to s. 1002.345. 357 6.âStudents articulating from one charter school to another 358 pursuant to an articulation agreement between the charter 359 schools that has been approved by the sponsor. 360 7.âStudents living in a development, or students whose 361 parent or legal guardian maintains a physical or permanent 362 employment presence within the development, in which a 363 developer, including any affiliated business entity or 364 charitable foundation, contributes to the formation, 365 acquisition, construction, or operation of one or more charter 366 schools or charter school facilities and related property in an 367 amount equal to or having a total appraised value of at least $5 368 million to be used as charter schools to mitigate the 369 educational impact created by the development of new residential 370 dwelling units. Students living in the development are entitled 371 to 50 percent of the student stations in the charter schools. 372 The students who are eligible for enrollment are subject to a 373 random lottery, the racial/ethnic balance provisions, or any 374 federal provisions, as described in subparagraph 4. The 375 remainder of the student stations must be filled in accordance 376 with subparagraph 4. 377 8.âStudents whose parent or legal guardian is employed 378 within a reasonable distance of the charter school, as described 379 in paragraph (20)(c). The students who are eligible for 380 enrollment are subject to a random lottery. 381 Section 5.âSubsections (17) and (19) of section 1002.42, 382 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 383 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 384 (17)âEPINEPHRINE SUPPLY.â 385 (a)âA private school may purchase a supply of United States 386 Food and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved epinephrine delivery 387 devices auto-injectors from a wholesale distributor as defined 388 in s. 499.003 or may enter into an arrangement with a wholesale 389 distributor or manufacturer as defined in s. 499.003 for the 390 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors at 391 fair-market, free, or reduced prices for use in the event a 392 student has an anaphylactic reaction. The FDA-approved 393 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be maintained 394 in a secure location on the private schoolâs premises. The 395 participating private school shall adopt a protocol developed by 396 a licensed physician for the administration by private school 397 personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic reaction 398 and to administer epinephrine by an FDA-approved epinephrine 399 delivery device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved 400 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to 401 and used by a student authorized to self-administer epinephrine 402 by an FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector under s. 403 1002.20(3)(i) or trained school personnel. 404 (b)âThe private school and its employees, agents, and the 405 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA 406 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not 407 liable for any injury arising from the use of an FDA-approved 408 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by 409 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and 410 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an 411 anaphylactic reaction: 412 1.âUnless the trained school personnelâs action is willful 413 and wanton; 414 2.âNotwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the 415 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been 416 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging 417 that the school district is not liable; and 418 3.âRegardless of whether authorization has been given by 419 the studentâs parents or guardians or by the studentâs 420 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 421 nurse. 422 (19)âFACILITIES AND LAND USE.â 423 (a)âA private school may use facilities on property owned 424 or leased by a library, community service organization, museum, 425 performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church facility under 426 s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years 427 of any executed agreement with a private school to use the 428 facilities; any facility or land owned by a Florida College 429 System institution or university; any similar public 430 institutional facilities; and any facility recently used to 431 house a school or child care facility licensed under s. 402.305, 432 under any such facilityâs preexisting zoning and land use 433 designations without rezoning or obtaining a special exception 434 or a land use change, and without complying with any mitigation 435 requirements or conditions. The facility must be located on 436 property used solely for purposes described in this paragraph, 437 and must meet applicable state and local health, safety, and 438 welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety and 439 building safety. 440 (b)âA private school may use facilities on property 441 purchased from a library, community service organization, 442 museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church 443 facility under s. 170.201, which is actively or was actively 444 used as such within 5 years of any executed agreement with a 445 private school to purchase the facilities; any facility or land 446 owned by a Florida College System institution or university; any 447 similar public institutional facilities; and any facility 448 recently used to house a school or child care facility licensed 449 under s. 402.305, under any such facilityâs preexisting zoning 450 and land use designations without obtaining a special exception, 451 rezoning, or a land use change, and without complying with any 452 mitigation requirements or conditions. The facility must be 453 located on property used solely for purposes described in this 454 paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health, 455 safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety 456 and building safety. 457 (c)âA private school located in a county with four 458 incorporated municipalities may construct new facilities, which 459 may be temporary or permanent, on property purchased from or 460 owned or leased by a library, community service organization, 461 museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church under 462 s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years 463 of any executed agreement with a private school; any land owned 464 by a Florida College System institution or state university; and 465 any land recently used to house a school or child care facility 466 licensed under s. 402.305, under its preexisting zoning and land 467 use designations without rezoning or obtaining a special 468 exception or a land use change, and without complying with any 469 mitigation requirements or conditions. Any new facility must be 470 located on property used solely for purposes described in this 471 paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health, 472 safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety 473 and building safety. 474 (d)âA private school enrolling 150 or fewer students, or 475 located within the unincorporated area of a county as defined in 476 s. 125.011, shall be considered a permitted use and occupancy in 477 a commercial or mixed-use zoning district within a county or 478 municipality without rezoning or obtaining a special exception 479 or a land use change, and without complying with any mitigation 480 requirements, conditions, performance standards, ordinances, 481 rules, codes, or policies, except that a county or municipality 482 may require proportionate mitigation measures necessary to 483 mitigate vehicular traffic and pedestrian safety. 484 1.âThe vehicular traffic and pedestrian safety mitigation 485 measures required by a county or municipality pursuant to this 486 subsection shall be limited to those impacts reasonably and 487 directly attributable to the operation of the private school at 488 the site and shall be no greater in cost or scope than what is 489 required of all other uses, education or otherwise, within the 490 same zoning district. 491 2.âThe private school subject to vehicular traffic and 492 pedestrian safety mitigation measures may, in lieu of complying 493 with such mitigation measures, provide a traffic study that 494 demonstrates the school will not have disproportionate impact on 495 vehicular traffic or pedestrian safety compared to other 496 allowable uses within the same zoning district. 497 3.âIf a local governing authority fails to comply with this 498 subsection, the aggrieved school or entity has an immediate 499 right to bring an action in circuit court for injunctive relief. 500 (e)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a private 501 school enrolling 150 or fewer students may operate in a facility 502 that is an existing assembly, day care, mercantile, or business 503 occupancy, as defined in the Florida Fire Prevention Code. A 504 private school operating in such a facility must meet the 505 standards for existing educational occupancy requirements under 506 the Florida Fire Prevention Code, adopted by the State Fire 507 Marshal. Completion of the fire safety evaluation system for 508 educational occupancies in the National Fire Protection 509 Association, Life Safety Code, NFPA 101A: Guide on Alternative 510 Approaches to Life Safety, adopted by the State Fire Marshal, by 511 a registered design professional licensed under chapter 471 or 512 chapter 481, with a determination of achieving at a minimum an 513 âat least equivalentâ conclusion, is considered evidence of 514 compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code. The State Fire 515 Marshal may adopt rules to implement this paragraph. 516 Section 6.âSubsection (2) of section 1002.67, Florida 517 Statutes, is amended to read: 518 1002.67âPerformance standards and curricula.â 519 (2)(a)âEach private prekindergarten provider and public 520 school may select or design the curriculum that the provider or 521 school uses to implement the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 522 (VPK) Program, except as otherwise required for a provider or 523 school that fails to meet the minimum performance metric score 524 or designation change-in-ability established pursuant to s. 525 1002.68. 526 (b)âEach private prekindergarten providerâs and public 527 schoolâs curriculum must be developmentally appropriate and 528 must: 529 1.âBe designed to prepare a student for early literacy and 530 provide for instruction in early math skills; 531 2.âDevelop studentsâ background knowledge through a 532 content-rich and sequential knowledge building early literacy 533 curriculum; 534 3.âEnhance the age-appropriate progress of students in 535 attaining the performance standards adopted by the department 536 under subsection (1); and 537 4.âSupport student learning gains through differentiated 538 instruction that shall be measured by the coordinated screening 539 and progress monitoring program under s. 1008.25(9). 540 (c)âThe department shall adopt procedures for the review 541 and approval of curricula for use by private prekindergarten 542 providers and public schools that fail to meet the minimum 543 performance metric score or designation change-in-ability scores 544 established pursuant to s. 1002.68. The department shall 545 administer the review and approval process and maintain a list 546 of the curricula approved under this paragraph and available for 547 purchase. Each approved curriculum must meet the requirements of 548 paragraph (b). The review and approval process must include 549 curricula that are available for purchase and proprietary 550 curricula that are not available for purchase. 551 (d)âThe department shall review and may approve a 552 curriculum that is proprietary or available for purchase outside 553 of the established review and approval process in paragraph (c). 554 The curriculum must be used by a private provider or public 555 school district that operates a VPK program in more than five 556 distinct locations. Any curriculum approved under this paragraph 557 must meet the requirements of paragraph (b). Any curriculum 558 approved under this paragraph which is available for purchase 559 must be included on the list under paragraph (c). Within 60 days 560 after receipt of the request, the department shall review and 561 approve or deny the submitted curricula and all associated 562 materials. A request may not be submitted under this paragraph 563 within 120 days before the opening of the regular review process 564 described in paragraph (c). 565 Section 7.âSubsection (3), paragraph (e) of subsection (4), 566 paragraph (a) of subsection (5), and paragraph (e) of subsection 567 (6) of section 1002.68, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 568 1002.68âVoluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 569 accountability.â 570 (3)(a)âFor the 2020-2021 program year, the department shall 571 calculate a kindergarten readiness rate for each private 572 prekindergarten provider and public school participating in the 573 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program based upon learning 574 gains and the percentage of students assessed as ready for 575 kindergarten. The department shall require that each school 576 district administer the statewide kindergarten screening in use 577 before the 2021-2022 school year to each kindergarten student in 578 the school district within the first 30 school days of the 2021 579 2022 school year. Private schools may administer the statewide 580 kindergarten screening to each kindergarten student in a private 581 school who was enrolled in the Voluntary Prekindergarten 582 Education Program. Learning gains shall be determined using a 583 value-added measure based on growth demonstrated by the results 584 of the preassessment and postassessment in use before the 2021 585 2022 program year. However, a provider may not be newly placed 586 on probationary status under this paragraph. A provider 587 currently on probationary status may only be removed from such 588 status if the provider earns the minimum rate, determined 589 pursuant to subsection (5). The methodology for calculating a 590 providerâs readiness rate may not include students who are not 591 administered the statewide kindergarten screening. 592 (b)âFor the 2021-2022 program year, kindergarten screening 593 results may not be used in the calculation of readiness rates. 594 Any private prekindergarten provider or public school 595 participating in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 596 which fails to meet the minimum kindergarten readiness rate for 597 the 2021-2022 program year is subject to the probation 598 requirements of subsection (5). 599 (3)(4) 600 (e)âSubject to an appropriation, the department shall 601 provide for a differential payment to a private prekindergarten 602 provider and public school based on the providerâs designation. 603 The maximum differential payment may not exceed a total of 15 604 percent of the base student allocation per full-time equivalent 605 student under s. 1002.71 attending in the consecutive program 606 year for that program. A private prekindergarten provider or 607 public school may not receive a differential payment if it 608 receives a designation of âproficientâ or lower. Before the 609 adoption of the methodology, the department shall confer with 610 the Council for Early Grade Success under s. 1008.2125 before 611 receiving approval from the State Board of Education for the 612 final recommendations on the designation system and differential 613 payments. 614 (4)(a)(5)(a)âIf a public schoolâs or private 615 prekindergarten providerâs program assessment composite score 616 for its prekindergarten classrooms fails to meet the minimum 617 program assessment composite score for contracting adopted in 618 rule by the department, the private prekindergarten provider or 619 public school may not participate in the Voluntary 620 Prekindergarten Education Program beginning in the consecutive 621 program year and thereafter until the public school or private 622 prekindergarten provider meets the minimum composite score for 623 contracting. A public school or private prekindergarten provider 624 may request one program assessment per program year in order to 625 requalify for participation in the Voluntary Prekindergarten 626 Education Program, provided that the public school or private 627 prekindergarten provider is not excluded from participation 628 under ss. 1002.55(6), 1002.61(10)(b), 1002.63(9)(b), or 629 paragraph (b) (5)(b) of this section. If a public school or 630 private prekindergarten provider would like an additional 631 program assessment completed within the same program year, the 632 public school or private prekindergarten provider shall be 633 responsible for the cost of the program assessment. 634 (5)(6) 635 (e)âA private prekindergarten provider or public school 636 granted a good cause exemption shall continue to implement its 637 improvement plan and continue the corrective actions required 638 under paragraph (4)(b) (5)(b) until the provider or school meets 639 the minimum performance metric. 640 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) and subsection 641 (7) of section 1002.71, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 642 1002.71âFunding; financial and attendance reporting.â 643 (6) 644 (b)1.âEach private prekindergarten providerâs and district 645 school boardâs attendance policy must require the parent of each 646 student in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program to 647 verify, each month, the studentâs attendance on the prior 648 monthâs certified student attendance. 649 2.âThe parent must submit the verification of the studentâs 650 attendance to the private prekindergarten provider or public 651 school on forms prescribed by the department. The forms must 652 include, in addition to the verification of the studentâs 653 attendance, a certification, in substantially the following 654 form, that the parent continues to choose the private 655 prekindergarten provider or public school in accordance with s. 656 1002.53 and directs that payments for the program be made to the 657 provider or school: 658 659 VERIFICATION OF STUDENTâS ATTENDANCE 660 AND CERTIFICATION OF PARENTAL CHOICE 661 662 I, ...(Name of Parent)..., swear (or affirm) that my child, 663 ...(Name of Student)..., attended the Voluntary Prekindergarten 664 Education Program on the days listed above and certify that I 665 continue to choose ...(Name of Provider or School)... to deliver 666 the program for my child and direct that program funds be paid 667 to the provider or school for my child. 668 ...(Signature of Parent)... 669 ...(Date)... 670 671 3.âThe private prekindergarten provider or public school 672 must keep each original signed form for at least 2 years. Each 673 private prekindergarten provider must permit the early learning 674 coalition, and each public school must permit the school 675 district, to inspect the original signed forms during normal 676 business hours. The department shall adopt procedures for early 677 learning coalitions and school districts to review the original 678 signed forms against the certified student attendance. The 679 review procedures must shall provide for the use of selective 680 inspection techniques, including, but not limited to, random 681 sampling. Each early learning coalition and the school districts 682 must comply with the review procedures. 683 (7)âThe department shall require that administrative 684 expenditures be kept to the minimum necessary for efficient and 685 effective administration of the Voluntary Prekindergarten 686 Education Program. Administrative policies and procedures must 687 shall be revised, to the maximum extent practicable, be revised 688 to incorporate the use of automation and electronic submission 689 of forms, including those required for child eligibility and 690 enrollment, provider and class registration, and monthly 691 certification of attendance for payment. A school district may 692 use its automated daily attendance reporting system for the 693 purpose of maintaining and transmitting attendance records to 694 the early learning coalition in a mutually agreed-upon format. 695 Each school district shall certify the correctness of attendance 696 data submitted to the single point of entry system described in 697 paragraph (5)(a) as required by the department. In addition, 698 actions must shall be taken to reduce paperwork, eliminate the 699 duplication of reports, and eliminate other duplicative 700 activities. Each early learning coalition may retain and expend 701 no more than 5.0 percent of the funds paid by the coalition to 702 private prekindergarten providers and public schools under 703 paragraph (5)(b). Funds retained by an early learning coalition 704 under this subsection may be used only for administering the 705 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program and may not be used 706 for the school readiness program or other programs. 707 Section 9.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (4) of 708 section 1002.945, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 709 1002.945âGold Seal Quality Care Program.â 710 (4)âIn order to obtain and maintain a designation as a Gold 711 Seal Quality Care provider, a child care facility, large family 712 child care home, or family day care home must meet the following 713 additional criteria: 714 (a)âThe child care provider must not have had any class I 715 violations, as defined by rule of the Department of Children and 716 Families, for which the Department of Children and Families 717 determines that the child care provider is the primary cause of 718 the violation within the 2 years preceding its application for 719 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of 720 a class I violation for which the Department of Children and 721 Families determines that the child care provider is the primary 722 cause of the violation shall be grounds for termination of the 723 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider until the 724 provider has no class I violations for a period of 2 years. 725 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), if the Department of 726 Education determines through a formal process that a provider 727 has been in business for at least 5 years and has no other class 728 I violations recorded, the department may recommend to the state 729 board that the provider maintain its Gold Seal Quality Care 730 status. The state boardâs determination regarding such 731 providerâs status is final. 732 Section 10.âParagraph (j) of subsection (2) of section 733 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 734 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 735 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 736 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 737 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 738 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 739 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 740 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 741 approved methods of instruction, the following: 742 (j)âThe elementary principles of agriculture. This 743 component must include, but need not be limited to, the history 744 of agriculture both nationally and specifically to this state, 745 the economic and societal impact of agriculture, and the various 746 agricultural industry sectors. The department, in collaboration 747 with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and the 748 University of Floridaâs Institute of Food and Agricultural 749 Sciences, shall prepare and offer standards and a curriculum for 750 the instruction required by this paragraph and may seek input 751 from state or nationally recognized agricultural educational 752 organizations. The department may contract with state or 753 nationally recognized agricultural educational organizations to 754 develop training for instructional personnel and grade 755 appropriate classroom resources to support the developed 756 curriculum. 757 758 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 759 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 760 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 761 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 762 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 763 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 764 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 765 Section 11.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) and subsection 766 (10) of section 1003.4282, Florida Statutes, are amended to 767 read: 768 1003.4282âRequirements for a standard high school diploma.â 769 (3)âSTANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT 770 REQUIREMENTS.â 771 (f)âOne credit in physical education.âPhysical education 772 must include the integration of health. Participation in an 773 interscholastic sport at the junior varsity or varsity level for 774 two full seasons shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in 775 physical education. A district school board may not require that 776 the one credit in physical education be taken during the 9th 777 grade year. Completion of 2 years of marching band shall satisfy 778 the one-credit requirement in physical education and or the one 779 credit requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be 780 used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the 781 requirement for adaptive physical education under an individual 782 education plan (IEP) or 504 plan. Completion of 1.0 credit with 783 a grade of âCâ or better in a dance techniques course, a 784 significant component of which is activities designed to 785 maintain or improve health-related fitness and lifelong fitness, 786 shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in physical education 787 or the one-credit requirement in performing arts. This credit 788 may not be used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or 789 the requirement for adaptive physical education under an IEP or 790 504 plan. Completion of one semester with a grade of âCâ or 791 better in a marching band class, in a physical activity class 792 that requires participation in marching band activities as an 793 extracurricular activity, or in a dance class shall satisfy one 794 half credit in physical education or one-half credit in 795 performing arts. This credit may not be used to satisfy the 796 personal fitness requirement or the requirement for adaptive 797 physical education under an IEP or 504 plan. Completion of 2 798 years in a Reserve Officer Training Corps (R.O.T.C.) class, a 799 significant component of which is drills, shall satisfy the one 800 credit requirement in physical education and the one-credit 801 requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be used to 802 satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the requirement for 803 adaptive physical education under an IEP or 504 plan. 804 (10)âCAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION CREDIT.âThe Department 805 of Education shall convene a workgroup, no later than December 806 1, 2024, to: 807 (a)âIdentify best practices in career and technical 808 education pathways from middle school to high school to aid 809 middle school students in career planning and facilitate their 810 transition to high school programs. The career pathway must be 811 linked to postsecondary programs. 812 (b)âEstablish three mathematics pathways for students 813 enrolled in secondary grades by aligning mathematics courses to 814 programs, postsecondary education, and careers. The workgroup 815 shall collaborate to identify the three mathematics pathways and 816 the mathematics course sequence within each pathway which align 817 to the mathematics skills needed for success in the 818 corresponding academic programs, postsecondary education, and 819 careers. 820 1.âThe mathematics pathways must incorporate the applied 821 algebra courses established under s. 1003.4936 which align the 822 Florida Standards for Algebra I with the career and technical 823 education standards and benchmarks for each designated career 824 cluster. 825 2.âEach mathematics pathway must include at least one 826 course sequence beginning with an applied algebra course aligned 827 to a specific career cluster. The workgroup shall identify 828 additional mathematics courses that follow each applied algebra 829 course and build on the algebraic reasoning, modeling, and 830 quantitative skills introduced through industry-relevant 831 applications. The mathematics pathways may include a plan to 832 create new mathematics courses to complete a pathway. 833 3.âEach mathematics pathway must offer flexibility and the 834 ability to move between pathways if necessary. 835 4.âMathematics pathways must create clear links between 836 precollege mathematics and college-level mathematics pathways, 837 and support student progression into postsecondary academic 838 programs, state college career and technical education programs, 839 career center programs, industry certification programs, and 840 high-skill, high-wage occupations. 841 5.âThe mathematics pathways that incorporate applied 842 algebra courses created under s. 1003.4936(3)(a)1. must be 843 identified no later than September 1, 2027. The mathematics 844 pathways that incorporate applied algebra courses created under 845 s. 1003.4936(3)(a)2. must be identified no later than September 846 1, 2028. The workgroup shall submit the identified mathematics 847 pathways to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 848 Speaker of the House of Representatives. 849 Section 12.âSection 1003.4936, Florida Statutes, is created 850 to read: 851 1003.4936âApplied algebra for career and technical 852 education.â 853 (1)âThe Legislature finds that algebra is an important step 854 in a studentâs mathematics pathway. Algebra is a prerequisite 855 for higher level mathematics courses, and success in algebra is 856 strongly connected with later mathematics success. Establishing 857 an applied algebra course that integrates career and technical 858 education standards equips students with mathematical skills 859 directly connected to real industry practices and increases the 860 relevance of algebra instruction. By contextualizing algebraic 861 concepts within authentic occupational problems, such applied 862 algebra courses improve student engagement, strengthen 863 understanding of core math standards, and better prepare 864 students for high-skill, high-wage careers. Such a course will 865 enable students to pass the Algebra I end-of-course assessment 866 and develop practical skills that support success in Floridaâs 867 workforce and postsecondary pathways. 868 (2)âThe Department of Education shall develop an applied 869 algebra course for each of the established career and technical 870 education career clusters. Each applied algebra course must: 871 (a)âIntegrate the career and technical education program 872 standards and benchmarks for the relevant career cluster with 873 the Florida Standards for Algebra I. 874 (b)âProvide students with rigorous, career-relevant 875 mathematical applications that demonstrate the use of algebraic 876 concepts in authentic industry problems, processes, or settings. 877 (c)âPrepare students to take the statewide, standardized 878 Algebra I end-of-course assessment required under s. 1008.22. 879 (d)âMeet all requirements for a mathematics credit required 880 for high school graduation under s. 1003.4282(3)(b) or for 881 middle grades promotion pursuant to s. 1003.4156(1)(b). 882 (3)(a)âThe department shall develop the courses on the 883 following timelines: 884 1.âApplied algebra courses in the following career clusters 885 must be developed and available for school district adoption in 886 the 2027-2028 school year: 887 a.âAgriculture, food, and natural resources. 888 b.âArchitecture and construction. 889 c.âBusiness management and administration. 890 d.âEnergy. 891 e.âEngineering and technology education. 892 f.âFinance. 893 g.âHealth science. 894 h.âInformation technology. 895 i.âManufacturing. 896 j.âTransportation and distribution logistics. 897 2.âApplied algebra courses in the following career clusters 898 must be developed and available for district adoption in the 899 2028-2029 school year: 900 a.âArts, audio-visual technology, and communications. 901 b.âEducation and training. 902 c.âGovernment and public administration. 903 d.âHospitality and tourism. 904 e.âHuman services. 905 f.âLaw, public safety, and security. 906 g.âMarketing, sales, and service. 907 (b)âIn grades 6 through 12, school districts may offer one 908 or more applied algebra courses in lieu of Algebra I, and 909 successful completion of the course will satisfy the Algebra I 910 credit requirement for high school graduation or middle grades 911 promotion. 912 (c)âThe department shall collaborate with the Board of 913 Governors of the State University System to ensure that each 914 applied algebra course is accepted as a mathematics credit for 915 state university admissions. 916 (d)âThe department shall provide professional development, 917 instructional resources, and technical assistance to support 918 school district implementation. 919 Section 13.âSubsection (5) is added to section 1003.5716, 920 Florida Statutes, to read: 921 1003.5716âTransition to postsecondary education and career 922 opportunities.âAll students with disabilities who are 3 years of 923 age to 21 years of age have the right to a free, appropriate 924 public education. As used in this section, the term âIEPâ means 925 individual education plan. 926 (5) 927 (a)âIf a related service identified in a studentâs IEP is 928 not provided as scheduled, the school district must notify the 929 parent or guardian in writing or by electronic means within 10 930 school days, explain the reason the service was not provided, 931 and discuss a plan for make-up services. 932 (b)âA parent or guardian has the right to access, upon 933 request, all service provider logs or progress notes within 15 934 school days after such service is provided. The school district 935 shall inform parents of this right at each IEP meeting. 936 Section 14.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 937 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 938 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 939 (3)âEducator preparation institutes approved pursuant to 940 this section may offer competency-based certification programs 941 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate 942 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the 943 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator 944 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based 945 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section 946 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved 947 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be 948 available for use by other approved educator preparation 949 institutes. 950 (b)âEach program participant must: 951 1.âMeet certification requirements pursuant to s. 952 1012.56(1) by obtaining a statement of status of eligibility 953 determining the participant is eligible for a certificate in the 954 certification subject area of the educational plan. An educator 955 preparation institute may allow a program participant to enroll 956 in and complete coursework while the participant is working to 957 obtain the statement of status of eligibility indicating 958 eligibility for a certificate in the certification subject area 959 of the educational plan. 960 2.âand Meet the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) before 961 participating in field experiences. 962 3.2.âDemonstrate competency and participate in field 963 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan 964 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering 965 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year, 966 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified 967 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all 968 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of 969 the endorsement practicum through the candidateâs field 970 experience, in order to graduate from the program. 971 4.3.âBefore completion of the program, fully demonstrate 972 his or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she 973 is seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on 974 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12 975 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving 976 a passing score on the professional education competency 977 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area 978 examination for the subject area certification which is required 979 by state board rule. 980 Section 15.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraph 981 (b) of subsection (4) of section 1004.933, Florida Statutes, are 982 amended to read: 983 1004.933âGraduation Alternative to Traditional Education 984 (GATE) Program.â 985 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 986 (b)ââInstitutionâ means any a school district career center 987 established under s. 1001.44, a charter technical career center 988 established under s. 1002.34, or a Florida College System 989 institution identified in s. 1000.21. Any such institution may 990 enter into an agreement with an online provider for the adult 991 education or career instruction portion of the program if such 992 provider offers instructional content and services that align 993 with the state career and adult education curriculum frameworks. 994 (4)âPAYMENT WAIVER; ELIGIBILITY.â 995 (b)âTo be eligible for participation in the GATE Program, a 996 student must: 997 1.âNot have earned a standard high school diploma pursuant 998 to s. 1003.4282 or a high school equivalency diploma pursuant to 999 s. 1003.435 before enrolling in the GATE Program; 1000 2.âHave been withdrawn from high school; 1001 3.âBe a resident of this state as defined in s. 1009.21(1); 1002 4.âBe at least 16 to 21 years of age at the time of initial 1003 enrollment, provided that a student who is 16 or 17 years of age 1004 has withdrawn from school enrollment pursuant to the 1005 requirements and safeguards in s. 1003.21(1)(c); 1006 5.âSelect the adult secondary education program and career 1007 education program of his or her choice at the time of admission 1008 to the GATE Program, provided that the career education program 1009 is included on the Master Credentials List under s. 445.004(4). 1010 The student is not required to enroll in adult secondary and 1011 career education program coursework simultaneously. The student 1012 may not change the requested pathway after enrollment, except 1013 that, if necessary for the student, the student may enroll in an 1014 adult basic education program prior to enrolling in the adult 1015 secondary education program; 1016 6.âMaintain a 2.0 GPA for career and technical education 1017 coursework; and 1018 7.âNotwithstanding s. 1003.435(4), complete the programs 1019 under subparagraph 5. within 3 years after his or her initial 1020 enrollment unless the institution determines that an extension 1021 is warranted due to extenuating circumstances. 1022 Section 16.âSection 1006.12, Florida Statutes, is amended 1023 to read: 1024 1006.12âSafe-school officers at each public school.âFor the 1025 protection and safety of school personnel, property, students, 1026 and visitors, each district school board and school district 1027 superintendent shall partner with law enforcement agencies or 1028 security agencies to establish or assign one or more safe-school 1029 officers at each school facility within the district, including 1030 charter schools. A district school board must collaborate with 1031 charter school governing boards to facilitate charter school 1032 access to all safe-school officer options available under this 1033 section. Notwithstanding any local ordinance or development 1034 order, the school district or charter school may implement any 1035 combination of the options in subsections (1)-(4) to best meet 1036 the needs of the school district and charter schools. 1037 (1)âSCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER.âA school district may 1038 establish school resource officer programs through a cooperative 1039 agreement with law enforcement agencies. 1040 (a)âSchool resource officers shall undergo criminal 1041 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation 1042 and be certified law enforcement officers, as defined in s. 1043 943.10(1), who are employed by a law enforcement agency as 1044 defined in s. 943.10(4). The powers and duties of a law 1045 enforcement officer shall continue throughout the employeeâs 1046 tenure as a school resource officer. 1047 (b)âSchool resource officers shall abide by district school 1048 board policies and shall consult with and coordinate activities 1049 through the school principal, but shall be responsible to the 1050 law enforcement agency in all matters relating to employment, 1051 subject to agreements between a district school board and a law 1052 enforcement agency. The agreements shall identify the entity 1053 responsible for maintaining records relating to training. 1054 Activities conducted by the school resource officer which are 1055 part of the regular instructional program of the school shall be 1056 under the direction of the school principal. 1057 (2)âSCHOOL SAFETY OFFICER.âA school district may commission 1058 one or more school safety officers for the protection and safety 1059 of school personnel, property, and students within the school 1060 district. The district school superintendent may recommend, and 1061 the district school board may appoint, one or more school safety 1062 officers. 1063 (a)âSchool safety officers shall undergo criminal 1064 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation 1065 and be law enforcement officers, as defined in s. 943.10(1), 1066 certified under chapter 943 and employed by either a law 1067 enforcement agency or by the district school board. If the 1068 officer is employed by the district school board, the district 1069 school board is the employing agency for purposes of chapter 1070 943, and must comply with that chapter. 1071 (b)âA school safety officer has and shall exercise the 1072 power to make arrests for violations of law on district school 1073 board property or on property owned or leased by a charter 1074 school under a charter contract, as applicable, and to arrest 1075 persons, whether on or off such property, who violate any law on 1076 such property under the same conditions that deputy sheriffs are 1077 authorized to make arrests. A school safety officer has the 1078 authority to carry weapons when performing his or her official 1079 duties. 1080 (c)âSchool safety officers must complete mental health 1081 crisis intervention training using a curriculum developed by a 1082 national organization with expertise in mental health crisis 1083 intervention. The training shall improve officersâ knowledge and 1084 skills as first responders to incidents involving students with 1085 emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de-escalation 1086 skills to ensure student and officer safety. 1087 (d)âA district school board may enter into mutual aid 1088 agreements with one or more law enforcement agencies as provided 1089 in chapter 23. A school safety officerâs salary may be paid 1090 jointly by the district school board and the law enforcement 1091 agency, as mutually agreed to. 1092 (3)âSCHOOL GUARDIAN.â 1093 (a)âAt the school districtâs or the charter school 1094 governing boardâs discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s. 1095 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may 1096 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach 1097 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of 1098 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals 1099 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned 1100 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory 1101 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and 1102 certification by a sheriff: 1103 1.âA school district employee or personnel, as defined 1104 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided 1105 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school 1106 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or 1107 2.âAn employee of a school district or a charter school who 1108 is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school 1109 guardian. 1110 (b)âBefore appointing an individual as a school guardian, 1111 the school district or charter school shall contact the 1112 Department of Law Enforcement and review all information 1113 maintained under s. 30.15(1)(k)3.c. related to the individual. 1114 (c)âThe department shall provide to the Department of Law 1115 Enforcement any information relating to a school guardian 1116 received pursuant to subsection (5). 1117 (4)âSCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.âA school district or charter 1118 school governing board may contract with a security agency as 1119 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard 1120 an individual who holds a Class âDâ and Class âGâ license 1121 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and 1122 contractual conditions are met: 1123 (a)âAn individual who serves as a school security guard, 1124 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section, 1125 must: 1126 1.âDemonstrate completion of 144 hours of required training 1127 conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2. 1128 2.âPass a psychological evaluation administered by a 1129 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the 1130 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the 1131 evaluation to the sheriffâs office and school district, charter 1132 school governing board, or employing security agency, as 1133 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to 1134 provide the sheriffâs office, school district, charter school 1135 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health 1136 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph. 1137 3.âSubmit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent 1138 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s. 1139 112.0455 and the sheriffâs office, school district, charter 1140 school governing board, or employing security agency, as 1141 applicable. 1142 4.âBe approved to work as a school security guard by the 1143 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will 1144 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in 1145 that county. The sheriffâs approval authorizes the security 1146 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the 1147 county, and the sheriffâs approval is not limited to any 1148 particular school. 1149 5.âSuccessfully complete ongoing training, weapon 1150 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff 1151 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and 1152 provide documentation to the sheriffâs office, school district, 1153 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as 1154 applicable. 1155 (b)âThe contract between a security agency and a school 1156 district or a charter school governing board regarding 1157 requirements applicable to school security guards serving in the 1158 capacity of a safe-school officer for purposes of satisfying the 1159 requirements of this section shall define the entity or entities 1160 responsible for maintaining records relating to training, 1161 inspection, and firearm qualification. 1162 (c)âSchool security guards serving in the capacity of a 1163 safe-school officer pursuant to this subsection are in support 1164 of school-sanctioned activities for purposes of s. 790.115, and 1165 must aid in the prevention or abatement of active assailant 1166 incidents on school premises. 1167 (d)âThe Office of Safe Schools shall provide the Department 1168 of Law Enforcement any information related to a school security 1169 guard that the office receives pursuant to subsection (5). 1170 (5)âNOTIFICATION.âThe district school superintendent or 1171 charter school administrator, or a respective designee shall 1172 notify the county sheriff and the Office of Safe Schools 1173 immediately after, but no later than 72 hours after: 1174 (a)âA safe-school officer is dismissed for misconduct or is 1175 otherwise disciplined. 1176 (b)âA safe-school officer discharges his or her firearm in 1177 the exercise of the safe-school officerâs duties, other than for 1178 training purposes. 1179 (6)âCRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING.âEach safe-school officer 1180 who is also a sworn law enforcement officer shall complete 1181 mental health crisis intervention training using a curriculum 1182 developed by a national organization with expertise in mental 1183 health crisis intervention. The training must improve the 1184 officerâs knowledge and skills as a first responder to incidents 1185 involving students with emotional disturbance or mental illness, 1186 including de-escalation skills to ensure student and officer 1187 safety. 1188 (7)âLIMITATIONS.âAn individual must satisfy the background 1189 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements 1190 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any 1191 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only 1192 by a sheriff. 1193 (8)âEXEMPTION.âAny information that would identify whether 1194 a particular individual has been appointed as a safe-school 1195 officer pursuant to this section held by a law enforcement 1196 agency, school district, or charter school is exempt from s. 1197 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 1198 1199 If a district school board, through its adopted policies, 1200 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any 1201 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school 1202 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety 1203 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the 1204 charter schoolâs share of the costs of the school resource 1205 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school 1206 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s. 1207 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district. 1208 Section 17.âPresent subsection (8) of section 1007.2616, 1209 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (9), and a new 1210 subsection (8) is added to that section, to read: 1211 1007.2616âComputer science and technology instruction.â 1212 (8)(a)âTo align educator credentials with instructional 1213 practice across grade levels, the State Board of Education shall 1214 establish by rule or maintain the following computer science 1215 subject area coverages: 1216 1.âComputer science, grades Kâ5; 1217 2.âComputer science, grades 6â12; and 1218 3.âComputer science, grades Kâ12. 1219 (b)âFor the coverages in paragraph (a), the State Board of 1220 Education shall adopt competencies and skills and designate 1221 corresponding examinations by rule. The comprehensive computer 1222 science coverage for grades K-12 and its examination shall 1223 remain available unless amended by rule of the state board. 1224 (c)1.âThe Department of Education shall present recommended 1225 competencies and skills for the coverages of grades Kâ5 and 1226 grades 6â12 to the State Board of Education for approval by 1227 September 1, 2026. 1228 2.âFollowing approval under subparagraph 1., the department 1229 shall coordinate development, piloting, and standard-setting for 1230 the examinations. The examinations for both grade-band coverages 1231 must be available for administration no later than January 1, 1232 2028. 1233 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4), paragraphs (b) 1234 and (d) of subsection (5), and paragraph (a) of subsection (9) 1235 of section 1008.25, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 1236 (d) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to read: 1237 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 1238 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 1239 requirements.â 1240 (4)âASSESSMENT AND SUPPORT.â 1241 (c)âA student who has a substantial reading deficiency as 1242 determined in paragraph (5)(a) or a substantial mathematics 1243 deficiency as determined in paragraph (6)(a) must be covered by 1244 a federally required student plan, such as an individual 1245 education plan or an individualized progress monitoring plan, or 1246 both, as necessary. The individualized progress monitoring plan 1247 must be developed within 45 days after the results of the 1248 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system become 1249 available. The plan must, at a minimum, include: 1250 1.âThe studentâs specific, identified reading or 1251 mathematics skill deficiency. 1252 2.âGoals and benchmarks for student growth in reading or 1253 mathematics. 1254 3.âA description of the specific measures that will be used 1255 to evaluate and monitor the studentâs reading or mathematics 1256 progress. 1257 4.âFor a substantial reading deficiency, the specific 1258 evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science of 1259 reading which the student will receive. 1260 5.âStrategies, resources, and materials that will be 1261 provided to the studentâs parent to support the student to make 1262 reading or mathematics progress. For a student with a 1263 substantial reading deficiency, resources must include 1264 information about the studentâs eligibility for the New Worlds 1265 Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485. 1266 6.âAny additional services the studentâs teacher deems 1267 available and appropriate to accelerate the studentâs reading or 1268 mathematics skill development. 1269 (d)âIf the coordinated screening and progress monitoring 1270 system under subsection (9), or any district-approved screening 1271 instrument, identifies a student as exhibiting characteristics 1272 of dyslexia or dyscalculia, the school district must: 1273 1.âEnsure that the student is covered by a plan under 1274 paragraph (b) which includes evidence-based interventions that 1275 are specific to the identified characteristics of dyslexia or 1276 dyscalculia and that are aligned, as appropriate, with the 1277 interventions required under subsections (5) and (6). 1278 2.âTreat the screening result as reasonable suspicion that 1279 the student may be a student with a disability for purposes of 1280 s. 1003.57 and promptly seek parental consent to conduct an 1281 initial evaluation consistent with State Board of Education rule 1282 and applicable federal law. 1283 3.âEnsure that screening activities and intervention 1284 procedures, including interventions required under this 1285 subsection and subsections (5) and (6), occur concurrently with 1286 the evaluation process and are not used to delay or deny an 1287 appropriate evaluation. 1288 (5)âREADING DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.â 1289 (b)âA Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student 1290 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early literacy skills 1291 based upon the results of the administration of the midyear or 1292 final coordinated screening and progress monitoring under 1293 subsection (9) shall be referred to the local school district 1294 and may be eligible to receive instruction in early literacy 1295 skills before participating in kindergarten. A Voluntary 1296 Prekindergarten Education Program student who scores below the 1297 25th 10th percentile on the final administration of the 1298 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection 1299 (9) shall be referred to the local school district and is 1300 eligible to receive early literacy skill instructional support 1301 through a summer bridge program the summer before participating 1302 in kindergarten. The summer bridge program must meet 1303 requirements adopted by the department and shall consist of 4 1304 hours of instruction per day for a minimum of 100 total hours. A 1305 student with an individual education plan who has been retained 1306 pursuant to paragraph (2)(g) and has demonstrated a substantial 1307 deficiency in early literacy skills must receive instruction in 1308 early literacy skills. 1309 (d)âThe parent of any student who exhibits a substantial 1310 deficiency in reading, as described in paragraph (a), must be 1311 immediately notified in writing of the following: 1312 1.âThat his or her child has been identified as having a 1313 substantial deficiency in reading, including a description and 1314 explanation, in terms understandable to the parent, of the exact 1315 nature of the studentâs difficulty in learning and lack of 1316 achievement in reading. 1317 2.âA description of the current services that are provided 1318 to the child. 1319 3.âA description of the proposed intensive interventions 1320 and supports that will be provided to the child that are 1321 designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency. 1322 4.âThe student progression requirements under paragraph 1323 (2)(h) and that if the childâs reading deficiency is not 1324 remediated by the end of grade 3, the child must be retained 1325 unless he or she is exempt from mandatory retention for good 1326 cause. 1327 5.âStrategies, including multisensory strategies and 1328 programming, through a read-at-home plan the parent can use in 1329 helping his or her child succeed in reading. The read-at-home 1330 plan must provide access to the resources identified in 1331 paragraph (e). 1332 6.âThat the statewide, standardized English Language Arts 1333 assessment is not the sole determiner of promotion and that 1334 additional evaluations, portfolio reviews, and assessments are 1335 available to the child to assist parents and the school district 1336 in knowing when a child is reading at or above grade level and 1337 ready for grade promotion. 1338 7.âThe districtâs specific criteria and policies for a 1339 portfolio as provided in subparagraph (7)(b)4. and the evidence 1340 required for a student to demonstrate mastery of Floridaâs 1341 academic standards for English Language Arts. A school must 1342 immediately begin collecting evidence for a portfolio when a 1343 student in grade 3 is identified as being at risk of retention 1344 or upon the request of the parent, whichever occurs first. 1345 8.âThe districtâs specific criteria and policies for 1346 midyear promotion. Midyear promotion means promotion of a 1347 retained student at any time during the year of retention once 1348 the student has demonstrated ability to read at grade level. 1349 9.âInformation about the studentâs eligibility for the New 1350 Worlds Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485 and the New Worlds 1351 Scholarship Accounts under s. 1002.411 and information on parent 1352 training modules and other reading engagement resources 1353 available through the initiative. 1354 1355 After initial notification, the school shall apprise the parent 1356 at least monthly of the studentâs progress in response to the 1357 intensive interventions and supports and the studentâs 1358 eligibility for the New Worlds Reading Initiative under s. 1359 1003.485. Such communications must be in writing and must 1360 explain any additional interventions or supports that will be 1361 implemented to accelerate the studentâs progress if the 1362 interventions and supports already being implemented have not 1363 resulted in improvement. Upon the request of the parent, the 1364 teacher or school administrator shall meet to discuss the 1365 studentâs progress. The parent may request more frequent 1366 notification of the studentâs progress, more frequent 1367 interventions or supports, and earlier implementation of the 1368 additional interventions or supports described in the initial 1369 notification. 1370 (9)âCOORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.â 1371 (a)âThe Department of Education, in collaboration with the 1372 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a 1373 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress 1374 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1375 Program and public schools. The system must: 1376 1.âMeasure student progress in meeting the appropriate 1377 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in 1378 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by 1379 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational 1380 strengths and needs of students. 1381 2.âFor students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1382 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral 1383 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness, 1384 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, 1385 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a 1386 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that 1387 measures equivalent levels of growth. 1388 3.âBe a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate 1389 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and 1390 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress; 1391 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading 1392 or mathematics, including identifying students with 1393 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning 1394 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by 1395 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia 1396 shall undergo further screening. Any student whose performance 1397 in the system meets thresholds established by State Board of 1398 Education rule in circumstances in which the system is not 1399 capable of identifying characteristics of dyslexia or 1400 dyscalculia must undergo further screening. The further 1401 screening required under this subparagraph is used to refine 1402 instructional planning and parental communication and is not a 1403 prerequisite for the interventions or evaluation obligations 1404 described in subsection (4). The State Board of Education shall 1405 adopt rules establishing timelines, performance thresholds, and 1406 parental notification requirements for further screening under 1407 this subparagraph. Screening activities under this subsection 1408 must occur concurrently with the interventions and evaluation 1409 obligations described in subsection (4) and may not be used to 1410 delay or deny an appropriate evaluation. Beginning with the 1411 2023-2024 school year, the coordinated screening and progress 1412 monitoring system must be computer-adaptive. 1413 4.âProvide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1414 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68. 1415 5.âProvide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 1416 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with 1417 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and 1418 parent communication. 1419 6.âProvide baseline data to the department of each 1420 studentâs readiness for kindergarten. The determination of 1421 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each 1422 studentâs initial progress monitoring assessment in 1423 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a studentâs 1424 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department 1425 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 1002.68(3) 1426 s. 1002.68(4). 1427 7.âAssess how well educational goals and curricular 1428 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state 1429 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the 1430 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for 1431 providers, districts, and schools. 1432 Section 19.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1433 1008.2125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1434 1008.2125âThe Council for Early Grade Success.â 1435 (1)âThe Council for Early Grade Success, a council as 1436 defined in s. 20.03(7), is created within the Department of 1437 Education to oversee the coordinated screening and progress 1438 monitoring program under s. 1008.25(9) for students in the 1439 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program through grade 3 and, 1440 except as otherwise provided in this section, shall operate 1441 consistent with s. 20.052. 1442 (a)âThe council shall be responsible for reviewing the 1443 implementation of, training for, and outcomes from the 1444 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program to provide 1445 recommendations to the department that support grade 3 students 1446 reading at or above grade level. The council, at a minimum, 1447 shall: 1448 1.âProvide recommendations on the implementation of the 1449 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program, including 1450 reviewing any procurement solicitation documents and criteria 1451 before being published. 1452 2.âDevelop training plans and timelines for such training. 1453 3.âIdentify appropriate personnel, processes, and 1454 procedures required for the administration of the coordinated 1455 screening and progress monitoring program. 1456 4.âProvide input on the methodology for calculating a 1457 providerâs or schoolâs performance metric and designations under 1458 s. 1002.68(3) s. 1002.68(4). 1459 5.âWork with the department to review the methodology for 1460 determining a childâs kindergarten readiness. 1461 6.âReview data on age-appropriate learning gains by grade 1462 level that a student would need to attain in order to 1463 demonstrate proficiency in reading by grade 3. 1464 7.âContinually review anonymized data from the results of 1465 the coordinated screening and progress monitoring program for 1466 students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 1467 through grade 3 to help inform recommendations to the department 1468 that support practices that will enable grade 3 students to read 1469 at or above grade level. 1470 Section 20.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) and subsection 1471 (5) of section 1008.33, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1472 1008.33âAuthority to enforce public school improvement.â 1473 (3) 1474 (c)âThe state board shall adopt by rule a differentiated 1475 matrix of intervention and support strategies for assisting 1476 traditional public schools identified under this section and 1477 rules for implementing s. 1002.33(9)(n), relating to charter 1478 schools. The intervention and support strategies must address 1479 student performance and may include improvement planning; 1480 leadership quality improvement; educator quality improvement; 1481 professional learning; curriculum review, pacing, and alignment 1482 across grade levels to improve background knowledge in social 1483 studies, science, and the arts; and the use of continuous 1484 improvement and monitoring plans and processes. In addition, the 1485 state board may prescribe reporting requirements to review and 1486 monitor the progress of the schools. The rule must define the 1487 intervention and support strategies for school improvement for 1488 schools earning a grade of âDâ or âFâ and the roles for the 1489 district and department. A school may not be required to use the 1490 measure of student learning growth in s. 1012.34(7) as the sole 1491 determinant to recruit instructional personnel. The rule must 1492 create a timeline for a school districtâs school improvement 1493 plan or district-managed turnaround plan to be approved and for 1494 the school improvement funds under Title I to be released to the 1495 school district. The timeline established by rule for the 1496 release of school improvement funding under Title I may not 1497 exceed 20 calendar days after the approval of the school 1498 improvement plan or district-managed turnaround plan. 1499 (5)âThe state board shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 1500 120.536(1) and 120.54 to administer this section. The rules 1501 shall include timelines for submission of implementation plans, 1502 approval criteria for implementation plans, timelines for 1503 releasing Title I funding, timelines for implementing 1504 intervention and support strategies, a standard charter school 1505 turnaround contract, a standard facility lease, and a mutual 1506 management agreement. The state board shall consult with 1507 education stakeholders in developing the rules. 1508 Section 21.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (2) of 1509 section 1010.20, Florida Statutes, to read: 1510 1010.20âCost accounting and reporting for school 1511 districts.â 1512 (2)âCOST REPORTING.â 1513 (e)âEach charter school shall receive and respond to 1514 monitoring questions from the department. 1515 Section 22.âSubsection (1) of section 1011.14, Florida 1516 Statutes, is amended to read: 1517 1011.14âObligations for a period of 1 year.âDistrict school 1518 boards are authorized only under the following conditions to 1519 create obligations by way of anticipation of budgeted revenues 1520 accruing on a current basis without pledging the credit of the 1521 district or requiring future levy of taxes for certain purposes 1522 for a period of 1 year; however, such obligations may be 1523 extended from year to year with the consent of the lender for a 1524 period not to exceed 4 years, or for a total of 5 years 1525 including the initial year of the loan: 1526 (1)âPURPOSES.âThe purposes for which such obligations may 1527 be incurred within the intent of this section shall include only 1528 the purchase of school buses, land, and equipment for 1529 educational purposes; the erection of, alteration to, or 1530 addition to educational plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary 1531 facilities; and the adjustment of insurance on educational 1532 property on a 5-year plan, as provided by rules of the State 1533 Board of Education. 1534 Section 23.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 1535 1011.69, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1536 1011.69âEquity in School-Level Funding Act.â 1537 (4)âAfter providing Title I, Part A, Basic funds to schools 1538 above the 75 percent poverty threshold, which may include high 1539 schools above the 50 percent threshold as permitted by federal 1540 law, school districts shall provide any remaining Title I, Part 1541 A, Basic funds directly to all eligible schools as provided in 1542 this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, an eligible 1543 school is a school that is eligible to receive Title I funds, 1544 including a charter school. The threshold for identifying 1545 eligible schools may not exceed the threshold established by a 1546 school district for the 2016-2017 school year or the statewide 1547 percentage of economically disadvantaged students, as determined 1548 annually. 1549 (a)âPrior to the allocation of Title I funds to eligible 1550 schools, a school district may withhold funds only as follows: 1551 1.âOne percent for parent involvement, in addition to the 1552 one percent the district must reserve under federal law for 1553 allocations to eligible schools for parent involvement; 1554 2.âA necessary and reasonable amount for administration 1555 which includes the districtâs indirect cost rate, not to exceed 1556 a total of 10 percent; 1557 3.âA reasonable and necessary amount to provide: 1558 a.âHomeless programs; 1559 b.âDelinquent and neglected programs; 1560 c.âPrekindergarten programs and activities; 1561 d.âPrivate school equitable services; and 1562 e.âTransportation for foster care children to their school 1563 of origin or choice programs; and 1564 4.âA necessary and reasonable amount, not to exceed 1 1565 percent, for eligible schools to provide educational services in 1566 accordance with the approved Title I plan. Such educational 1567 services may include the provision of STEM curricula, 1568 instructional materials, and related learning technologies that 1569 support academic achievement in science, technology, 1570 engineering, and mathematics in Title I schools, including, but 1571 not limited to, technologies related to drones, coding, 1572 animation, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, data science, 1573 the engineering design process, mobile development, and 1574 robotics. Funds may be reserved under this subparagraph only to 1575 the extent that all required reservations under federal law have 1576 been met and that such reservation does not reduce school-level 1577 allocations below the levels required under federal law. 1578 Section 24.âSubsections (2) through (6) of section 1011.71, 1579 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1580 1011.71âDistrict school tax.â 1581 (2)âIn addition to the maximum millage levy as provided in 1582 subsection (1), each school board may levy not more than 1.5 1583 mills against the taxable value for school purposes for charter 1584 schools pursuant to s. 1013.62(1) and (3) and for district 1585 schools for operational or capital purposes to fund: 1586 (a)âNew construction, remodeling projects, sites and site 1587 improvement or expansion to new sites, existing sites, auxiliary 1588 facilities, athletic facilities, or ancillary facilities. 1589 (b)âMaintenance, renovation, and repair of existing school 1590 plants or of leased facilities to correct deficiencies pursuant 1591 to s. 1013.15(2). 1592 (c)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of school buses. 1593 (d)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of new and 1594 replacement equipment; computer and device hardware and 1595 operating system software necessary for gaining access to or 1596 enhancing the use of electronic and digital instructional 1597 content and resources; and enterprise resource software 1598 applications that are classified as capital assets in accordance 1599 with definitions of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, 1600 have a useful life of at least 5 years, and are used to support 1601 districtwide administration or state-mandated reporting 1602 requirements. Enterprise resource software may be acquired by 1603 annual license fees, maintenance fees, or lease agreements. 1604 (e)âPayments for educational facilities and sites due under 1605 a lease-purchase agreement entered into by a district school 1606 board pursuant to s. 1003.02(1)(f) or s. 1013.15(2), not 1607 exceeding, in the aggregate, an amount equal to three-fourths of 1608 the proceeds from the millage levied by a district school board 1609 pursuant to this subsection. The three-fourths limit is waived 1610 for lease-purchase agreements entered into before June 30, 2009, 1611 by a district school board pursuant to this paragraph. If 1612 payments under lease-purchase agreements in the aggregate, 1613 including lease-purchase agreements entered into before June 30, 1614 2009, exceed three-fourths of the proceeds from the millage 1615 levied pursuant to this subsection, the district school board 1616 may not withhold the administrative fees authorized by s. 1617 1002.33(20) from any charter school operating in the school 1618 district. 1619 (f)âPayment of loans approved pursuant to ss. 1011.14 and 1620 1011.15. 1621 (g)âPayment of costs directly related to complying with 1622 state and federal environmental statutes, rules, and regulations 1623 governing school facilities. 1624 (h)âPayment of costs of leasing relocatable educational 1625 facilities, of renting or leasing educational facilities and 1626 sites pursuant to s. 1013.15(2), or of renting or leasing 1627 buildings or space within existing buildings pursuant to s. 1628 1013.15(4). 1629 (i)âPayment of the cost of school buses when a school 1630 district contracts with a private entity to provide student 1631 transportation services if the district meets the requirements 1632 of this paragraph. 1633 1.âThe districtâs contract must require that the private 1634 entity purchase, lease-purchase, or lease, and operate and 1635 maintain, one or more school buses of a specific type and size 1636 that meet the requirements of s. 1006.25. 1637 2.âEach such school bus must be used for the daily 1638 transportation of public school students in the manner required 1639 by the school district. 1640 3.âAnnual payment for each such school bus may not exceed 1641 10 percent of the purchase price of the state pool bid. 1642 4.âThe proposed expenditure of the funds for this purpose 1643 must have been included in the district school boardâs notice of 1644 proposed tax for school capital outlay as provided in s. 1645 200.065(10). 1646 (j)âPayment of the cost of the opening day collection for 1647 the library media center of a new school. 1648 (k)âPayment of salaries and benefits for employees whose 1649 job duties support activities funded by this subsection. 1650 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), if the revenue from 1.5 1651 mills is insufficient to meet the payments due under a lease 1652 purchase agreement entered into before June 30, 2009, by a 1653 district school board pursuant to paragraph (2)(e), or to meet 1654 other critical district fixed capital outlay needs, the board, 1655 in addition to the 1.5 mills, may levy up to 0.25 mills for 1656 fixed capital outlay in lieu of levying an equivalent amount of 1657 the discretionary mills for operations as provided in the 1658 General Appropriations Act. Millage levied pursuant to this 1659 subsection is subject to the provisions of s. 200.065 and, 1660 combined with the 1.5 mills authorized in subsection (2), may 1661 not exceed 1.75 mills. If the district chooses to use up to 0.25 1662 mills for fixed capital outlay, the compression adjustment 1663 pursuant to s. 1011.62(5) shall be calculated for the standard 1664 discretionary millage that is not eligible for transfer to 1665 capital outlay. 1666 (4)âIf the revenue from the millage authorized in 1667 subsection (2) is insufficient to make payments due under a 1668 lease-purchase agreement entered into prior to June 30, 2008, by 1669 a district school board pursuant to paragraph (2)(e), an amount 1670 up to 0.5 mills of the taxable value for school purposes within 1671 the school district shall be legally available for such 1672 payments, notwithstanding other restrictions on the use of such 1673 revenues imposed by law. 1674 (5)âA school district may expend, subject to s. 200.065, up 1675 to $200 per unweighted full-time equivalent student from the 1676 revenue generated by the millage levy authorized by subsection 1677 (2) to fund, in addition to expenditures authorized in 1678 paragraphs (2)(a)-(j), expenses for the following: 1679 (a)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of driverâs 1680 education vehicles; motor vehicles used for the maintenance or 1681 operation of plants and equipment; security vehicles; or 1682 vehicles used in storing or distributing materials and 1683 equipment. 1684 (b)âPayment of the cost of premiums, as defined in s. 1685 627.403, for property and casualty insurance necessary to insure 1686 school district educational and ancillary plants. As used in 1687 this paragraph, casualty insurance has the same meaning as in s. 1688 624.605(1)(b), (d), (f), (g), (h), and (m). Operating revenues 1689 that are made available through the payment of property and 1690 casualty insurance premiums from revenues generated under this 1691 subsection may be expended only for nonrecurring operational 1692 expenditures of the school district. 1693 (6)âViolations of the expenditure provisions in subsection 1694 (2) or subsection (5) shall result in an equal dollar reduction 1695 in the Florida Education Finance Program (FEFP) funds for the 1696 violating district in the fiscal year following the audit 1697 citation. 1698 Section 25.âSubsection (2) of section 1011.73, Florida 1699 Statutes, is amended to read: 1700 1011.73âDistrict millage elections.â 1701 (2)âMILLAGE AUTHORIZED NOT TO EXCEED 4 YEARS.âThe district 1702 school board, pursuant to resolution adopted at a regular 1703 meeting, shall direct the county commissioners to call an 1704 election at which the electors within the school district may 1705 approve an ad valorem tax millage as authorized under s. 1706 1011.71(7) s. 1011.71(9). Such election may be held at any time, 1707 except that not more than one such election shall be held during 1708 any 12-month period. Any millage so authorized shall be levied 1709 for a period not in excess of 4 years or until changed by 1710 another millage election, whichever is earlier. If any such 1711 election is invalidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, 1712 such invalidated election shall be considered not to have been 1713 held. 1714 Section 26.âSection 1011.804, Florida Statutes, is amended 1715 to read: 1716 1011.804âGATE Startup Grant Program.â 1717 (1)âThe GATE Startup Grant Program is established within 1718 the Department of Education to fund and support the startup and 1719 implementation of the GATE Program, subject to legislative 1720 appropriation. The purpose of the grant program is to increase 1721 access to programs that support adult learners earning a high 1722 school credential, either a high school diploma or its 1723 equivalent, and a workforce credential aligned to statewide or 1724 regional demand. The department shall administer the grants, 1725 determine eligibility, and distribute grant awards. 1726 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âinstitutionâ means a 1727 school district career center established under s. 1001.44, a 1728 charter technical career center established under s. 1002.34, or 1729 a Florida College System institution identified in s. 1000.21 1730 which offers the GATE Program pursuant to s. 1004.933. 1731 (3)âThe department may solicit proposals from institutions 1732 without programs that meet the requirements of s. 1004.933. Such 1733 institutions must be located in or serve a rural area of 1734 opportunity , as defined in s. 288.0656(2)(d) as designated by 1735 the Governor. For purposes of this subsection, an institution 1736 serves a rural area of opportunity if the institutionâs service 1737 area includes one or more counties or municipalities included 1738 within a rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 1739 288.0656(2)(d). An institutionâs principal place of business, 1740 main campus, or administrative offices are not required to be 1741 located within a rural area of opportunity in order to satisfy 1742 the service requirement. 1743 (a)âThe department may award a grant to an institution 1744 that, at the time of application, does not offer programs that 1745 meet the requirements of s. 1004.933 to support startup and 1746 implementation activities. 1747 (b)âThe department may award a grant to an institution 1748 that, at the time of application, offers programs that meet the 1749 requirements of s. 1004.933 only for costs authorized in 1750 subsection (6), excluding new construction, structural 1751 expansion, and major renovation. 1752 (4)âThe department shall prioritize grant proposals that 1753 combine adult basic education, adult secondary education, and 1754 career education programs at one location or allow students to 1755 complete programs through distance learning. An applicant may 1756 not receive more than 10 percent of the total amount 1757 appropriated for the program. 1758 (5)âThe department shall make the grant application 1759 available to potential applicants no later than August 15 of 1760 each year in which funds are appropriated for the program, 2024. 1761 A grant proposal must include: 1762 (a)âThe institution or institutions that will provide the 1763 adult basic education, adult secondary education, and career 1764 education programs; 1765 (b)âThe proposed adult basic education and adult secondary 1766 education program or programs the institution or institutions 1767 will provide, and the projected enrollment for such program or 1768 programs; 1769 (c)âThe proposed career education program or programs the 1770 institution or institutions will provide and the projected 1771 enrollment for such program or programs; 1772 (d)âThe credential or credentials associated with the 1773 career education program or programs. Such credential or 1774 credentials must be included on the Master Credentials List 1775 under s. 445.004(4); 1776 (e)âThe cost of instruction for all programs contemplated 1777 in the proposal, including costs for tuition, fees, 1778 registration, and laboratory, examination, and instructional 1779 materials costs; 1780 (f)âOutreach strategies, including collaboration with local 1781 workforce development boards; and 1782 (g)âA plan or timeline for implementing s. 1004.933 and 1783 enrolling students; and 1784 (h)âDocumentation identifying the counties or 1785 municipalities within the institutionâs service area which are 1786 included in a rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 1787 288.0656(2)(d). 1788 (6)âGrant funds may be used for planning activities and 1789 other expenses associated with the creation and implementation 1790 of the GATE Program, such as expenses related to program 1791 instruction, instructional equipment, supplies, instructional 1792 personnel, and student services, minor facility modifications 1793 necessary to install or operate instructional equipment used for 1794 the GATE Program, and marketing and outreach activities to 1795 recruit and enroll eligible students. Marketing and outreach 1796 activities and minor facility modifications authorized under 1797 this subsection are allowable direct costs of program 1798 implementation. Grant funds may not be used for indirect costs. 1799 Grant recipients must submit an annual report in a format 1800 prescribed by the department. The department shall consolidate 1801 such annual reports and include the reports in the report 1802 required by s. 1004.933(6). 1803 (7)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 1804 administer this section. 1805 Section 27.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1806 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1807 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 1808 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 1809 (3)(a)âCollective bargaining.âNotwithstanding provisions of 1810 chapter 447 related to district school board collective 1811 bargaining, collective bargaining may not preclude a district 1812 school board from carrying out its constitutional and statutory 1813 duties related to the following: 1814 1.âProviding incentives to effective and highly effective 1815 teachers. 1816 2.âImplementing intervention and support strategies under 1817 s. 1008.33 to address the causes of low student performance and 1818 improve student academic performance and attendance. 1819 3.âImplementing student discipline provisions required by 1820 law, including a review of a studentâs abilities, past 1821 performance, behavior, and needs. 1822 4.âImplementing school safety plans and requirements. 1823 5.âImplementing staff and student recognition programs. 1824 6.âDistributing correspondence to parents, teachers, and 1825 community members related to the daily operation of schools and 1826 the district. 1827 7.âProviding any required notice or copies of information 1828 related to the district school board or district operations 1829 which is readily available on the school districtâs website. 1830 8.âThe school districtâs calendar. 1831 9.âProviding salary supplements pursuant to sub 1832 subparagraph (1)(c)5.c.(III). 1833 10.âImplementing the salary increases and salary 1834 distribution plan required under s. 1011.62(14). 1835 Section 28.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 1836 1012.555, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1837 1012.555âTeacher Apprenticeship Program.â 1838 (2) 1839 (d)âAn apprentice teacher must be appointed by the district 1840 school board or work in the district as an education 1841 paraprofessional and must be paid in accordance with s. 446.032 1842 and rules adopted by the State Board of Education. 1843 Section 29.â(1)âThe Department of Education shall 1844 collaborate with the Lastinger Center for Learning at the 1845 University of Florida to recommend to the Legislature 1846 individualized, adaptive artificial intelligence tools to 1847 support mathematics instruction in grades K-12. The 1848 recommendations must: 1849 (a)âEnsure that recommended tools align to the Florida 1850 academic standards and prepare students for state assessments. 1851 (b)âConsider alternate mathematics sequencing and grade 1852 level progression, and alternate funding models to support 1853 individualized progression through content. 1854 (c)âEvaluate the extent to which the tools provide real 1855 time diagnostic assessments, individualized learning pathways, 1856 adaptive sequencing of content, and immediate, personalized 1857 feedback to students. 1858 (d)âEvaluate the applicability of the tools to progress 1859 monitoring tools, district learning management systems, 1860 suggested interventions, small-group instructional supports, and 1861 professional development that enables teachers to integrate the 1862 tools into classroom instruction. 1863 (e)âProvide for student data privacy and transparency in 1864 data collection and retention. 1865 (f)âConsider statewide and district-level costs. 1866 (2)âThe department shall submit its recommendations to the 1867 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 1868 House of Representatives by December 1, 2026. 1869 Section 30.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.